Hawaii, session 2026, GM1214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that livestock production
is an important contributor to the State's economy, food
security, and land stewardship. Livestock producers responsibly
manage their animals through fencing and low-stress handling
techniques to ensure their health and well-being.
The legislature further finds that uncontrolled dogs often
harass, injure, or kill livestock, causing significant losses.
Livestock producers experience severe financial and emotional
impacts from dog attacks, as a single attack can result in the
loss of up to eighty animals.
The legislature also finds that California addresses dog
attacks on livestock through strict liability provisions under
the California Food and Agricultural Code, which may serve as a
model for Hawaii.
The purpose of this Act is to increase penalties and
enforcement mechanisms relating to dog attacks on livestock on
land or premises within the agricultural district to ensure dog
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO 1
iniiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiMiiin

Page 2 2152
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
owners maintain control of their animals and are held
accountable when attacks occur. Authorizing the destruction of
dogs that harass livestock is consistent with existing law,
which provides similar protections for wildlife.
SECTION 2. Section 142-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) For the purposes of this section, "habitual
agricultural crime perpetrator" means a person [wheT-j^
(1) Who, within five years of the instant offense, has any
combination of three or more prior convictions for
criminal offenses under this chapter or one or more
prior convictions under this section[—]; or
(2) Who has been found liable four or more times under
section 142-74; provided that each liability finding
shall be a final judgment entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction.
The convictions or liability findings shall be for separate
incidents on separate dates. The prosecution shall not be
required to prove any state of mind with respect to the person's
status as a habitual agricultural crime perpetrator. Proof that
the person has the requisite minimum prior convictions o_r
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO
■iniiinHiininiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3
H B. NO.
C.D. 1
liability findings shall be sufficient to establish this
element."
SECTION 3. Section 142-74, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§142-74 [Liability of dog ownerpenalty-] Damage to
livestock or other property by dogs; liability; penalties. (a)
If any dog, while on [private property] land or premises in the
agricultural district classified pursuant to chapter 205 without
the consent of the owner or person in possession of that
[poepertyT-] land or premises, injures or destroys any [sheep-,-
cafetrl-c,—goQt7' hog7—fowl,-] livestock or other property belonging
to any person other than the owner [ef] or person responsible
f^£ the dog, the owner [ef-] or person responsible for the dog
shall be liable in damages to the person injured for twice the
value of the property so injured or destroyed. [4?he]
(b) The owner of any livestock, the owner's agent, or the
owner's family member may destroy a dog if the dog is found in
the act of injuring, destroying, or persistently pursuing or
harassing livestock on land or premises in the agricultural
district classified pursuant to chapter 205 that are not owned
or possessed by the owner of the dog. No civil or criminal
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
action shall be maintained for destruction of a dog pursuant to
this subsection.
(c) After any incident described in subsection (a), the
owner of the dog shall confine or destroy the dog [-?—and if] . If
the owner of the dog neglects or refuses to do so, and the dog
subsequently causes further damage to the owner of the livestock
or property of another, the^ owner of the dog, [in the event of
any -ft^rthor damage being done to the person or property-of any
pe^^sen—by—fehie—deg-r] in addition to paying the person injured for
the damage, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, be fined no less
than $1, 000, and pay the costs of the trial, and [it oha-1-1 be
lawf-ul for any other person- to- dostro-y the—dog. ] the dog may be
lawfully destroyed by the owner of the livestock, the owner's
agent, or the owner's family member.
(d) If a dog described in subsection (a) is not destroyed
pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) and a person sustains any loss
or damage to livestock caused by the dog, or if any livestock is
destroyed because the livestock was injured or pursued by the
dog, the person may file a complaint in the district court of
the circuit in which the loss or damage occurred and the judge
may order the dog be humanely euthanized.
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO

Page 5 2152
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
[ (b)-] (e) Each county may enact and enforce ordinances
regulating persons who own, harbor, or keep any dog that has
injured, maimed, or destroyed an animal belonging to another
person. No ordinance enacted under this subsection shall be
held invalid on the ground that it covers any subject or matter
embraced within any statute or rule of the State; provided that
the ordinance shall not affect the civil liability of a person
owning, harboring, or keeping the dog. Upon enactment of an
ordinance, whether enacted on, before, or after June 30, 2001,
the ordinance shall have full force and effect; provided that
the ordinance is consistent with this section.
(f) Any destruction of a dog authorized under this section
shall be carried out using means that are reasonable under the
circumstances and not intended to cause undue suffering.
(g) For the purposes of this section, "livestock" means
animals raised for agricultural production or value, including
cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, and other domesticated
farm animals."
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO 5
inniiMiiiiNiiiiiiiiiiiH

Page 6 2152
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3453 HB2152 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVE OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2152, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertily that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2152, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
49-26